Tennessee, session 114, HB1809.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-102(d), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2), an offense under this section is a
Class C misdemeanor.
(2) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor if the person
commits the offense while engaged in the business of removing accumulated wastes
from subsurface sewage disposal systems, as defined in § 68-221-402.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-413(a), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2), a violation of this part or rules
promulgated pursuant to this part is a Class C misdemeanor.
(2) An offense under § 68-221-406(a)(7) involving the unlawful disposal of
sewage or effluent from a subsurface sewage disposal system is a Class B
misdemeanor if the person commits the offense while engaged in the business of
removing accumulated wastes from subsurface sewage disposal systems.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-713(f)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(A) Except as provided in subdivision (f)(1)(B), a violation of this part or rules
promulgated pursuant to this part is a Class C misdemeanor.
HB1809
010799
- 1 -

(B) An offense under § 68-221-711(5) involving the unlawful discharge of
sewage or any other waste or contaminant is a Class B misdemeanor if the person
commits the offense while engaged in the business of removing accumulated wastes
from subsurface sewage disposal systems, as defined in § 68-221-402.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010799